Colorado, session 2026A, HB1047.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Access to stable and affordable housing is a fundamental right
and essential to an individual's dignity, security, and ability to thrive, and
eviction practices that are opaque or unfair undermine this foundation for
thousands of Colorado residents;
(b) Evictions and threats of eviction create destabilizing
consequences for individuals and families, including negative health
impacts, increased housing costs, diminished housing quality, loss of
-2- HB26-1047

community, and heightened long-term housing insecurity;
(c) Evictions result not only in the loss of a home but also the loss
of possessions, employment stability, and educational continuity for
children, and an eviction record can prevent families from relocating to
decent and affordable housing in safer neighborhoods; and
(d) Protecting the dignity of tenants throughout the eviction
process is essential to a fair and functional housing system and necessary
to reduce the deep and lasting harms caused by displacement.
(2) The general assembly also finds that:
(a) Colorado has seen a significant rise in eviction filings in recent
years, with approximately 31,500 filings in 2024 and more than 50,000
filings in 2025, including roughly 32,000 nonpayment-of-rent cases and
nearly 13,000 lease-violation cases, revealing a landscape in which
residents with low incomes, seniors, and working families face increasing
risk of displacement;
(b) Eviction filings disproportionately affect Coloradans with
limited financial resources and those without reliable access to online
banking, electronic payment systems, or legal assistance, deepening
existing inequities;
(c) Tenants navigating the judicial system without legal
representation are far more likely to lose their housing, in part because
they lack awareness of their procedural and substantive rights and the
information necessary to defend themselves effectively;
(d) Many tenants do not understand how to access or interpret the
documents underlying their eviction case, making the process less
transparent, less navigable, and more likely to produce avoidable and
life-altering hardship;
-3- HB26-1047

(e) Ensuring that tenants and landlords have timely access to the
documents that give rise to an eviction, including the lease, rent ledger,
and any evidence of alleged violations, allows both parties to understand
the nature of the dispute from the outset;
(f) Requiring landlords to provide these key documents early in
the process promotes fairness, reduces unsupported filings, and improves
communication, efficiency, and accuracy in resolving housing disputes;
(g) When an eviction concludes and a final judgment is entered in
favor of the landlord, it is in the state's interest that the court records of
the eviction remain suppressed because public access to eviction filings,
even after final judgment, creates long-term barriers to securing safe and
stable housing;
(h) Publishing anonymized judicial opinions in eviction cases
strengthens transparency and consistency in Colorado's housing laws and
expands access to legal precedent for the public, advocates, and courts;
and
(i) Distinguishing evictions involving substantial lease violations
from other types of evictions in record-suppression policies protects
tenants from long-term harm while preserving transparency in matters
that implicate community safety.
(3) The general assembly also finds that:
(a) Reliable, accessible, and affordable rent payment methods are
critical to preventing avoidable eviction filings and maintaining stable
housing;
(b) Many low-income households, seniors, rural residents, and
residents who are disabled lack reliable broadband access, preventing
them from using online or app-based payment systems that landlords
-4- HB26-1047

increasingly require;
(c) Requiring tenants to pay rent exclusively online or through
systems that impose fees creates financial strain, increases the likelihood
of missed payments, and leads to preventable eviction filings; and
(d) Requiring landlords to provide at least one free, nonelectronic
method of rent payment ensures that all tenants can meet their obligations
reliably and without facing technological or financial barriers.
(4) Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is essential to:
(a) Ensure transparent, dignified, and fair eviction proceedings for
all tenants and landlords;
(b) Suppress court records of eviction proceedings in order to
protect tenants from long-term housing barriers;
(c) Distinguish evictions for substantial lease violations from
other types of evictions in record-suppression policies; and
(d) Guarantee that all tenants, regardless of income, technological
access, or familiarity with the legal system, have access to court records,
legal precedent, and reliable, free rent payment options in order to
promote stable homes and thriving communities across the state.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-106, add (5)
and (6) as follows:
13-40-106. Written demand.
(5) (a) THE DEMAND OR NOTICE REQUIRED BY SECTION 13-40-104
OR 38-12-1303 MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A COPY OF THE LEASE IF THE PROPERTY IS OCCUPIED PURSUANT
TO A WRITTEN LEASE; AND
(II) FOR A DEMAND RELATING TO THE ALLEGED NONPAYMENT OF
RENT, A CURRENT, UP-TO-DATE RENT LEDGER SHOWING ALL RENT
-5- HB26-1047

PAYMENTS THAT HAVE BEEN MADE BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE TENANT.
(b) A LANDLORD'S FAILURE TO SATISFY A REQUIREMENT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES AN
AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE FOR THE TENANT WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE
DEMAND IN ANY ACTION THAT PROCEEDS THEREAFTER TO EVICT THE
TENANT.
(6) IF A LANDLORD POSTS A WRITTEN DEMAND OR NOTICE
REQUIRED BY SECTION 13-40-104 OR 38-12-1303:
(a) THE DEMAND OR NOTICE MUST INCLUDE A CITATION TO THE
SPECIFIC PROVISION WITHIN SECTION 13-40-104 (1) OR 38-12-1303 (2)
THAT DESCRIBES THE BASIS FOR THE DEMAND OR NOTICE; AND
(b) THE LANDLORD SHALL REDACT FROM THE DOCUMENT ANY
SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS, DATES OF BIRTH, DRIVER'S LICENSE OR STATE
IDENTIFICATION NUMBERS, AND BANK ACCOUNT, CREDIT CARD, AND DEBIT
CARD NUMBERS.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-110, amend
(3) and (3.5) as follows:
13-40-110. Action - how commenced - report.
(3) The A complaint FILED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 40 must
include:
(a) A designation of whether the plaintiff elects to participate in
any hearing in person or remotely by phone or video on a platform
designated by the court. Upon filing AFTER THE PLAINTIFF FILES the
complaint, the court shall provide the plaintiff with any necessary
information to facilitate the plaintiff's participation.
(b) A box indicating if WHETHER the eviction is for a residential
or commercial tenancy;
-6- HB26-1047

(c) A COPY OF THE NOTICE TO VACATE OR DEMAND THAT WAS
SERVED PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-40-108; AND
(d) FOR COMPLAINTS FILED RELATING TO AN ALLEGED LEASE
VIOLATION OR A NO-FAULT EVICTION, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
38-12-1303, ANY RECORDS IN THE LANDLORD'S POSSESSION THAT PERTAIN
TO THE ALLEGED LEASE VIOLATION OR NO-FAULT EVICTION.
(3.5) If the A RESIDENTIAL tenant provides written or actual notice
to the A landlord that the RESIDENTIAL tenant is a victim-survivor of
unlawful sexual behavior, stalking, domestic violence, or domestic abuse,
AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN SECTION 13-40-104, and the
RESIDENTIAL tenant consents to the landlord sharing the information with
the court, the landlord shall disclose the information on the complaint or
with the return of service filed with the court.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-40-110.5, amend
(3)(a) and (4); and add (7) as follows:
13-40-110.5. Automatic suppression of court records -
definition.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section,
when AFTER an order granting the A plaintiff possession of the A premises
is entered in an action to which this section applies:
(I) IF THE RECORD CONCERNS AN ACTION FILED UNDER SECTION
13-40-104 (1)(d.5) FOR A SUBSTANTIAL VIOLATION OF A LEASE, the record
is no longer a suppressed court record, and the court shall make the record
available to the public unless the parties to the action agree that the record
remain suppressed. If the parties agree that the record remain suppressed,
the record remains a suppressed court record.
(II) IF THE RECORD DOES NOT CONCERN AN ACTION UNDER
-7- HB26-1047

SECTION 13-40-104 (1)(d.5) FOR A SUBSTANTIAL VIOLATION OF A LEASE,
THE RECORD REMAINS A SUPPRESSED COURT RECORD.
(4) The names of the parties included in a court record that is
suppressed pursuant to this section may be used by the court for
administrative purposes, but the court shall not, for any reason, publish
the names of the parties online. A COURT MAY PUBLISH A JUDICIAL
OPINION CONCERNING AN ACTION PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 40 IF THE
NAMES AND IDENTIFIERS OF THE PARTIES ARE ANONYMIZED.
(7) IF A RECORD OF AN EVICTION ACTION IS SUPPRESSED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION, A TENANT WHO IS PARTY TO THE EVICTION ACTION MAY
DENY OR NOT DISCLOSE THE EXISTENCE OF THE RECORD IF AN INQUIRY IS
MADE DURING THE TENANT SCREENING OR RENTAL APPLICATION PROCESS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 38-12-802 as
follows:
38-12-802. Tenant payment - receipts - nonelectronic payment
options.
(1) (a) Upon receiving any payment made in person by a tenant
with cash or a money order, a landlord shall contemporaneously provide
the tenant with a receipt indicating the amount the tenant paid and the
date of payment.
(b) If the A landlord receives a payment that is not delivered in
person by the tenant with cash or a money order, if requested by the
tenant, the landlord shall, within seven days after the request, provide the
tenant with a receipt indicating the amount the tenant paid, the recipient,
and the date of payment, unless there is already an existing procedure that
provides a tenant with a record of the payment received that indicates the
amount the tenant paid, the recipient, and the date of payment.
-8- HB26-1047

(c) A landlord may provide the tenant with an electronic receipt
unless the tenant requests a paper receipt, in which case the landlord shall
provide the tenant with a paper receipt. For purposes of this section, a
receipt may be included as part of a billing statement.
(2) A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE A TENANT AT LEAST ONE RENT
PAYMENT OPTION THAT DOES NOT REQUIRE THE TENANT TO ACCESS AN
ONLINE PORTAL OR PAY A TRANSACTION FEE.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-9- HB26-1047